Maryland, session 2026, HB1565.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – State Personnel and Pensions
2–501.
(a) In this subtitle the following terms have the meanings indicated.
(c) “Program” means the State Employee and Retiree Health and Welfare
Benefits Program.
2–503.
(a) The Secretary shall:
(1) adopt regulations for the administration of the Program;
(2) ensure that the Program complies with:
(i) all federal and State laws governing employee benefit plans; and
(ii) §§ 15–826, 15–826.1, 15–826.2, and, as applicable to
contraceptive drugs and devices, 15–831(a) through (d) of the Insurance Article;
(3) each year, recommend to the Governor the State share of the costs of
the Program; and
(4) make ongoing eligibility determinations to ensure that participation in
the Program does not impede, undermine, or conflict with federal compliance obligations or
government and cafeteria plan status.
(b) (1) The Secretary may arrange as the Secretary considers appropriate any
benefit option for inclusion in the Program.
(2) The Secretary shall include in the Program an option to purchase up to
$200,000 of additional life insurance coverage for employees who:
(i) fly in a helicopter in the course of their employment with the
State;
(ii) scuba dive in the course of their employment with the State; or

HOUSE BILL 1565 3
(iii) as a result of their employment with the State, face a significant
likelihood of receiving a less favorable life insurance rating than an individual employed in
a nonhazardous position.
(3) (i) The Secretary shall include a wellness program in the Program.
(ii) The wellness program shall:
1. be developed in consultation with the Secretary of Health;
2. promote the goals of the Maryland Department of Health
State Health Improvement Process; and
3. aim to achieve savings in the Program over time that
exceed the costs of the wellness program.
(4) (I) THE SECRETARY SHALL INCLUDE AN OBESITY TREATMENT
AND MANAGEMENT PROGRAM IN THE PROGRAM.
(II) THE OBESITY TREATMENT AND MANAGEMENT PROGRAM
SHALL:
1. BE DEVELOPED IN CONSULTATION WITH THE
SECRETARY OF HEALTH;
2. PROMOTE EVIDENCE–BASED, INTENSIVE,
MULTICOMPONENT BEHAVIORAL AND LIFESTYLE MODIFICATION INTERVENTIONS
THAT SUPPORT HEALTHY WEIGHT MANAGEMENT FOR INDIVIDUALS DIAGNOSED
WITH OBESITY, DIABETES, AND OTHER OBESITY–RELATED CONDITIONS;
3. FOR THE PURPOSE OF PREVENTING OR DELAYING
THE ONSET OF TYPE 2 DIABETES, INCLUDE STRUCTURED BEHAVIORAL CHANGE
SESSIONS APPROVED BY THE CENTERS FOR DISEASE CONTROL AND PREVENTION;
4. PROVIDE COVERAGE FOR:
A. MEDICATION APPROVED BY THE FEDERAL FOOD AND
DRUG ADMINISTRATION FOR CHRONIC WEIGHT MANAGEMENT IN INDIVIDUALS
DIAGNOSED WITH OBESITY, DIABETES, AND OTHER OBESITY–RELATED CONDITIONS;
AND
B. METABOLIC AND BARIATRIC SURGERY; AND
5. PROVIDE SERVICES IN OFFICE–BASED, VIRTUAL, AND
COMMUNITY–BASED SETTINGS TO SUPPORT STATE EMPLOYEE ACCESS.

HOUSE BILL 1565
(III) THE OBESITY TREATMENT AND MANAGEMENT PROGRAM
MAY APPLY UTILIZATION MANAGEMENT AND PRIOR AUTHORIZATION
REQUIREMENTS TO DETERMINE MEDICAL NECESSITY FOR THE TREATMENT OF
OBESITY IF:
1. MEDICAL NECESSITY DETERMINATIONS ARE MADE
USING THE SAME STANDARDS APPLIED TO THE TREATMENT OF OTHER CHRONIC
DISEASES; AND
2. UTILIZATION MANAGEMENT PRACTICES ARE NOT
APPLIED IN A MANNER THAT IS MORE RESTRICTIVE THAN THOSE USED FOR
COMPARABLE MEDICAL OR SURGICAL BENEFITS.
(c) The Secretary shall specify by regulation the types or categories of State
employees who:
(1) are eligible to enroll and participate in the Program with State
subsidies;
(2) are eligible to enroll and participate in the Program without State
subsidies; and
(3) are not eligible to enroll or participate in the Program.
(d) (1) The regulations adopted by the Secretary shall include provisions for
the enrollment and participation of employees of all:
(i) organizations and entities that were participating in the
Program as satellite organizations on January 1, 1993; and
(ii) employee organizations that qualify for payroll deductions under
the provisions of § 2–403 of this title.
(2) Employees of organizations and entities covered by this section may
participate:
(i) without State subsidies; and
(ii) with payment by the organization or entity of administrative
costs resulting from the participation of its employees in the Program.
(3) The regulations adopted by the Secretary under this subsection shall
provide that an employee organization specified in paragraph (1)(ii) of this subsection:

HOUSE BILL 1565 5
(i) may not enroll or participate in the Program unless the
organization has notified the Secretary, in writing, on or before July 1, 1994 of the
organization’s intent to enroll and participate in the Program during calendar year 1994;
and
(ii) may not enroll or participate in the Program on or after January
1, 1995 unless the organization has participated in the Program during calendar year 1994.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That the Laws of Maryland read
as follows:
Article – Insurance
15–839.1.
(A) IN THIS SECTION, “OBESITY TREATMENT AND MANAGEMENT PROGRAM”
MEANS A PROGRAM THAT:
(1) PROMOTES EVIDENCE–BASED, INTENSIVE, MULTICOMPONENT
BEHAVIORAL AND LIFESTYLE MODIFICATION INTERVENTIONS THAT SUPPORT
HEALTHY WEIGHT MANAGEMENT FOR INDIVIDUALS DIAGNOSED WITH OBESITY,
DIABETES, AND OTHER OBESITY–RELATED CONDITIONS;
(2) FOR THE PURPOSE OF PREVENTING OR DELAYING THE ONSET OF
TYPE 2 DIABETES, INCLUDES STRUCTURED BEHAVIORAL CHANGE SESSIONS
APPROVED BY THE CENTERS FOR DISEASE CONTROL AND PREVENTION;
(3) PROVIDES:
(I) MEDICATION APPROVED BY THE FEDERAL FOOD AND DRUG
ADMINISTRATION FOR CHRONIC WEIGHT MANAGEMENT IN INDIVIDUALS
DIAGNOSED WITH OBESITY, DIABETES, AND OTHER OBESITY–RELATED CONDITIONS;
AND
(II) METABOLIC AND BARIATRIC SURGERY; AND
(4) PROVIDES SERVICES IN OFFICE–BASED, VIRTUAL, AND
COMMUNITY–BASED SETTINGS TO SUPPORT ACCESS.
(B) THIS SECTION APPLIES TO:
(1) INSURERS AND NONPROFIT HEALTH SERVICE PLANS THAT
PROVIDE COVERAGE FOR PRESCRIPTION DRUGS UNDER INDIVIDUAL, GROUP, OR

HOUSE BILL 1565
BLANKET HEALTH INSURANCE POLICIES OR CONTRACTS THAT ARE USED OR
DELIVERED IN THE STATE; AND
(2) HEALTH MAINTENANCE ORGANIZATIONS THAT PROVIDE
COVERAGE FOR PRESCRIPTION DRUGS UNDER INDIVIDUAL OR GROUP CONTRACTS
THAT ARE ISSUED OR DELIVERED IN THE STATE.
(C) AN ENTITY SUBJECT TO THIS SECTION SHALL PROVIDE COVERAGE FOR
THE OBESITY TREATMENT AND MANAGEMENT PROGRAM TO AN INDIVIDUAL WHO
HAS BEEN DIAGNOSED WITH OBESITY, DIABETES, OR OTHER OBESITY–RELATED
CONDITIONS.
SECTION 3. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall apply to all
policies, contracts, and health benefit plans issued, delivered, or renewed in the State on or
after January 1, 2027.
SECTION 4. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That Sections 2 and 3 of this Act
shall take effect January 1, 2027.
SECTION 5. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That, except as provided in Section
4 of this Act, this Act shall take effect October 1, 2026.